North Dakota, session 69, HB1337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT - REPORT.
There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $10,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
department of health and human services, for the purpose of providing mental health and
substance use disorder treatment services for incarcerated individuals, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The department of health and human
services may distribute funding for grants to counties, and each county receiving a grant shall
report to the department of health and human services annually regarding funds expended,
services provided, individuals served, outcomes, and challenges. The department of health and
human services or its authorized agent may contract with private entities for mental health and
substance use disorder treatment services for incarcerated individuals. The department of
health and human services shall report to the legislative management by September 2026
regarding a summary of the contracted treatment serves and county reports and any
recommendations for future funding and program changes.
Page No. 1 25.0877.02000